Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 404, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 404. A. 1. The Department of Human Services, in
consultation with the Oklahoma Commission on Children and Youth,
shall appoint advisory committees of representatives of child care
facilities and others to recommend minimum requirements and
desirable standards for promulgation by the Department.
2. Committee members shall be appointed for a three-year term,
with a two-consecutive-term limit. The committees shall include
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repr esentation for all categories of facilities licensed by the
Department and shall be comprised as follows:
a. the Residential Children’s Services subcommittee shall
include at a minimum:
(1) a representative of a statewide organization
representing children in care arrangements
outside their own home,
(2) a representative of a statewide organization
providing residential services to youth in state
custody,
(3) a recipient or former recipient of youth services
for children in state custody,
(4) a representative of a statewide organization
promoting adoption services,
(5) a parent or guardian providing foster care to a
child or children in state custody,
(6) a representative from a nonpublic, long-term
residential care facility for children in state
custody,
(7) a representative from an organization promoting
the interests of Native American children in
state custody,
(8) a provider of medical services for children,
(9) a practicing behavioral health services provider,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(10) a representative from an agency providing child-
placing services, and
(11) other appropriate representatives at the
discretion of the Department of Human Services
and Commission on Children and Youth,
b. the Child Care Centers subcommittee shall include at a
minimum:
(1) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for children in care arrangements
outside their own home,
(2) a representative of a statewide organization
conducting programs for school-age children,
(3) a parent or guardian with a child attending a
licensed child care facility,
(4) a representative of a licensed child care
facility in a rural area,
(5) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for licensed child care facilities
owned or operated by Native Americans,
(6) a representative of a licensed child care
facility in an urban/suburban area,
(7) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for programs provided under the Head
Start program,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(8) a representative with knowledge of child care
programs offered by career technology center in
this state,
(9) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for early childhood education
programs,
(10) a representative of a statewide organization
providing resources and referrals to child care
facilities,
(11) a provider of medical services for children, and
(12) other appropriate representatives at the
discretion of the Department of Human Services
and Commission on Children and Youth,
c. the Child Care Homes subcommittee shall include at a
minimum:
(1) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for children in care arrangements
outside their own home,
(2) a parent or guardian with a child receiving care
at a licensed child care home,
(3) a representative of a licensed child care home in
a rural area,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(4) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for licensed child care facilities
owned or operated by Native Americans,
(5) a representative of a licensed child care home in
an urban/suburban area,
(6) a representative of a statewide organization
advocating for early childhood education
programs,
(7) a representative of a statewide organization
providing resources and referrals to child care
facilities,
(8) a provider of medical services for children, and
(9) other appropriate representatives at the
discretion of the Department of Human Services
and Commission on Children and Youth, and
d. the Quality Rating and Improvement System subcommittee
shall include representatives of child care centers
and child care homes currently licensed by the State
and other members as determined by the Department of
Human Services and the Commission on Children and
Youth.
3. The Department shall create a Child Care Facility Peer
Review Board whose purpose shall be to participate in the
Department’s grievance process. A majority of the Board shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repr esentatives of child care facilities. The Department shall
promulgate rules specifying the duties of the Child Care Facility
Peer Review Board in the grievance process.
4. The advisory committee shall designate two people to serve
on the Department’s Stars Administrative Review Panel. At least one
designee shall be the owner or operator of a licensed child care
center.
B. Child care facilities shall not allow children to be left
alone in the care of any person under eighteen (18) years of age
without supervision or sixteen (16) years of age with supervision as
delineated by the Department’s rules. Child care centers and family
child care homes shall not:
1. Use soft or loose bedding, including, but not limited to,
blankets, in sleeping equipment or in sleeping areas used only for
infants;
2. Allow toys or educational devices in sleeping equipment or
in a sleeping area used only for infants; or
3. Place a child in sleeping equipment or in a sleeping area
which has not been previously approved for use as such by the
Department.
C. The Department shall promulgate rules establishing minimum
requirements and desirable standards as may be deemed necessary or
advisable to carry out the provisions of the Oklahoma Child Care
Facilities Licensing Act.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. Such rules shall not be promulgated until after consultation
with the State Department of Health, the State Department of
Education, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the State
Fire Marshal, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Oklahoma
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services and any
other agency deemed necessary by the Department. Not less than
sixty (60) days’ notice, electronically, or as requested by regular
mail, shall be given to all current licensees before any changes are
made in such rules.
E. In order to improve the standards of child care, the
Department shall advise and cooperate with licensees, the governing
bodies and staff of licensed child care facilities and assist the
staff through advice of progressive methods and procedures, and
suggestions for the improvement of services.
F. The Department may participate in federal programs for child
care services, and enter into agreements or plans on behalf of the
state for that purpose, in accordance with federal laws and
regulations.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 404.1, as
amended by Section 343, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (10 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 404.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 404.1. A. On and after November 1, 2013:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Prior to the issuance of a permit or license, owners and
responsible entities making a request to establish or operate a
child care facility shall have:
a. an Oklahoma State Courts Network search conducted by
the Department,
b. a Restricted Registry search conducted by the
facility,
c. a national criminal history records search conducted
pursuant to paragraph 10 of this subsection,
d. a criminal history records and sex offender registry
search conducted by an authorized source, when the
individual has lived outside this state within the
last five (5) years,
e. a search of the Department of Corrections’ files
maintained pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration
Act and conducted by the Department of Human Services,
f. a search of any available child abuse and neglect
registry within a state the individual has resided in
within the last five (5) years,
g. search of the nontechnical services worker abuse
registry maintained by the State Department of Health
pursuant to Section 1-1950.7 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

h. a search of the community services worker registry
maintained by the Department of Human Services
pursuant to Section 1025.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. Prior to the employment of an individual:
a. an Oklahoma State Courts Network search, conducted by
the Department, shall be requested and received by the
facility; provided however, if twenty-four (24) hours
has passed from the time the request to the Department
was made, the facility may initiate employment,
notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph,
b. a Restricted Registry search shall be conducted by the
facility with notification of the search submitted to
the Department,
c. a national criminal history records search pursuant to
paragraph 10 of this subsection shall be submitted,
d. a criminal history records and sex offender registry
search conducted by an authorized source, when the
individual has lived outside this state within the
last five (5) years, shall be submitted to the
Department,
e. a search of the Department of Corrections’ files
maintained pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Act shall be conducted by the Department and received
by the facility,
f. a search of any available child abuse and neglect
registry within a state the individual has resided in
within the last five (5) years,
g. search of the nontechnical services worker abuse
registry maintained by the State Department of Health
pursuant to Section 1-1950.7 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and
h. a search of the community services worker registry
maintained by the Department of Human Services
pursuant to Section 1025.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. Prior to allowing unsupervised access to children by
employees or individuals, including contract employees and
volunteers and excluding the exceptions in paragraph 8 of this
subsection:
a. Oklahoma State Courts Network search results,
conducted by the Department, shall be received by the
facility,
b. a Child Care Restricted Registry search shall be
conducted by the facility with notification of the
search submitted to the Department,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. national criminal history records search results
pursuant to paragraph 10 of this subsection shall be
received by the facility,
d. a criminal history records and sex offender registry
search conducted by an authorized source, when the
individual has lived outside this state within the
last five (5) years shall be submitted to the
Department,
e. a search of the Department of Corrections’ files
maintained pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration
Act shall be conducted by the Department and received
by the facility,
f. a search of any available child abuse and neglect
registry within a state the individual has resided in
within the last five (5) years,
g. search of the nontechnical services worker abuse
registry maintained by the State Department of Health
pursuant to Section 1-1950.7 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and
h. a search of the community services worker registry
maintained by the Department of Human Services
pursuant to Section 1025.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Prior to the issuance of a permit or license and prior to
the residence of adults who subsequently move into a facility,
adults living in the facility excluding the exception in paragraph 7
of this subsection shall have:
a. an Oklahoma State Courts Network search conducted by
the Department and the facility shall be in receipt of
the search results,
b. a Restricted Registry search conducted by the facility
with notification of the search submitted to the
Department,
c. a national criminal history records search conducted
pursuant to paragraph 10 of this subsection,
d. a criminal history records and sex offender registry
search conducted by an authorized source, when the
individual has lived outside this state within the
last five (5) years,
e. a search of the Department of Corrections’ files
maintained pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration
Act conducted by the Department and received by the
facility,
f. a search of any available child abuse and neglect
registry within a state the individual has resided in
within the last five (5) years,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

g. search of the nontechnical services worker abuse
registry maintained by the State Department of Health
pursuant to Section 1-1950.7 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and
h. a search of the community services worker registry
maintained by the Department of Human Services
pursuant to Section 1025.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
5. Children who reside in the facility and turn eighteen (18)
years of age excluding the exception in paragraph 7 of this
subsection shall have:
a. an Oklahoma State Courts Network search conducted by
the Department,
b. a Restricted Registry search conducted by the facility
with notification of the search submitted to the
Department,
c. a national criminal history records search conducted
pursuant to paragraph 10 of this subsection, and
d. a search of the Department of Corrections’ files
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act
conducted by the Department and received by the
facility;
6. Prior to review of or access to fingerprint results, owners,
responsible entities, directors, and other individuals who have
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

revi ew of or access to fingerprint results shall have a national
criminal history records search pursuant to paragraph 10 of this
subsection;
7. Provisions specified in paragraphs 4 and 5 of this
subsection shall not apply to residents who are receiving services
from a residential child care facility;
8. A national criminal history records search pursuant to
paragraph 10 of this subsection shall not be required for volunteers
who transport children on an irregular basis when a release is
signed by the parent or legal guardian noting their understanding
that the volunteer does not have a completed national criminal
history records search. The provisions in paragraph 3 of this
subsection shall not be required for specialized service
professionals who are not employed by the program and have
unsupervised access to a child when a release is signed by the
parent or legal guardian noting his or her understanding of this
exception. These exceptions shall not preclude the Department from
requesting a national fingerprint or an Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation name-based criminal history records search or
investigating criminal, abusive, or harmful behavior of such
individuals, if warranted;
9. A national criminal history records search pursuant to
paragraph 10 of this subsection shall be required on or before
November 1, 2016, for existing owners, responsible entities,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

empl oyees, individuals with unsupervised access to children, and
adults living in the facility, as of November 1, 2013, unless
paragraph 6 of this subsection applies;
10. The Department shall require a national criminal history
records search based upon submission of fingerprints that shall:
a. be conducted by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and the federal National Child Protection Act
and the federal Volunteers for Children Act with the
Department as the authorized agency,
b. be submitted and have results received between the
Department and the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation through secure electronic transmissions,
c. include Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation rap
back, requiring the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation to immediately notify the Department
upon receipt of subsequent criminal history activity,
and
d. be paid by the individual or the facility;
11. The Director of the Department, or designee, shall
promulgate rules that may authorize an exception to the
fingerprinting requirements for individuals who have a severe

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

phys ical condition which precludes such individuals from being
fingerprinted;
12. The Director of the Department, or designee, shall
promulgate rules that ensure individuals obtain a criminal history
records search, not to include the re-submission of fingerprints,
not less than once during each five (5) year period;
13. Any individual who refuses to consent to the criminal
background check or knowingly makes a materially-false statement in
connection with such criminal background check shall be ineligible
for ownership of, employment of or residence in a child care
facility; and
14. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall require national
criminal history records searches, as defined by Section 150.9 of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which shall be provided by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining
the national criminal history records search, including Rap Back
notification of and through direct request by the Office of Juvenile
Affairs on behalf of any:
a. operator or responsible entity making a request to
establish or operate a secure detention center,
municipal juvenile facility, community intervention
center or secure facility licensed or certified by the
Office of Juvenile Affairs,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. employee or applicant of a secure detention center,
municipal juvenile facility, community intervention
center or secure facility licensed or certified by the
Office of Juvenile Affairs, or
c. persons allowed unsupervised access to children,
including contract employees or volunteers, of a
secure detention center, municipal juvenile facility,
community intervention center or secure facility
licensed or certified by the Office of Juvenile
Affairs.
B. 1. a. On and after September 1, 1998:
(1) any child-placing agency contracting with a
person for foster family home services or in any
manner for services for the care and supervision
of children shall also, prior to executing a
contract, complete:
(a) a foster parent eligibility assessment for
the foster care provider except as otherwise
provided by divisions (2) and (4) of this
subparagraph, and
(b) a national criminal history records search
based upon submission of fingerprints for
any adult residing in the foster family home
through the Department of Human Services
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-7-
106 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
except as otherwise provided by divisions
(2) and (4) of this subparagraph,
(2) the child-placing agency may place a child
pending completion of the national criminal
history records search if the foster care
provider and every adult residing in the foster
family home has resided in this state for at
least five (5) years immediately preceding such
placement,
(3) a national criminal history records search based
upon submission of fingerprints to the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation shall also be
completed for any adult who subsequently moves
into the foster family home,
(4) provided, however, the Director of Human Services
or the Director of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs, or a designee, may authorize an
exception to the fingerprinting requirement for a
person residing in the home who has a severe
physical condition which precludes such person’s
being fingerprinted, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(5) any child care facility contracting with any
person for foster family home services shall
request the Office of Juvenile Affairs to conduct
a juvenile justice information system review,
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 2-7-905
and 2-7-308 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes, for any child over the age of thirteen
(13) years residing in the foster family home,
other than a foster child, or who subsequently
moves into the foster family home. As a
condition of contract, the child care facility
shall obtain the consent of the parent or legal
guardian of the child for such review.
b. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to
foster care providers having a contract or contracting
with a child-placing agency, the Department of Human
Services or the Office of Juvenile Affairs prior to
September 1, 1998. Such existing foster care
providers shall comply with the provisions of this
section, until otherwise provided by rules of the
Department or by law.
2. a. (1) On and after September 1, 1998, except as
otherwise provided in divisions (2) and (4) of
this subparagraph, prior to contracting with a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

foster family home for placement of any child who
is in the custody of the Department of Human
Services or the Office of Juvenile Affairs, each
Department shall complete a foster parent
eligibility assessment, pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities
Licensing Act, for such foster family applicant.
In addition, except as otherwise provided by
divisions (2) and (4) of this subparagraph, the
Department shall complete a national criminal
history records search based upon submission of
fingerprints for any adult residing in such
foster family home.
(2) The Department of Human Services and Office of
Juvenile Affairs may place a child pending
completion of the national criminal history
records search if the foster care provider and
every adult residing in the foster family home
has resided in this state for at least five (5)
years immediately preceding such placement.
(3) A national criminal history records search based
upon submission of fingerprints conducted by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall also

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

be completed for any adult who subsequently moves
into the foster family home.
(4) The Director of Human Services or the Director of
the Office of Juvenile Affairs or their designee
may authorize an exception to the fingerprinting
requirement for any person residing in the home
who has a severe physical condition which
precludes such person’s being fingerprinted.
b. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to
foster care providers having a contract or contracting
with a child-placing agency, the Department of Human
Services or the Office of Juvenile Affairs prior to
September 1, 1998. Such existing foster care
providers shall comply with the provisions of this
section, until otherwise provided by rules of the
Department or by law.
3. The Department of Human Services or the Office of Juvenile
Affairs shall provide for a juvenile justice information system
review pursuant to Section 2-7-308 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes for any child over the age of thirteen (13) years residing
in a foster family home, other than the foster child, or who
subsequently moves into the foster family home.
C. The Department or the Board of Juvenile Affairs shall
promulgate rules to identify circumstances when a criminal history
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reco rds search or foster parent eligibility assessment for an
applicant or contractor, or any person over the age of thirteen (13)
years residing in a private residence in which a child care facility
is located, shall be expanded beyond the records search conducted by
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise provided
pursuant to this section.
D. Except as otherwise provided by the Oklahoma Children’s Code
and subsection F of this section, a conviction for a crime shall not
be an absolute bar to employment, but shall be considered in
relation to specific employment duties and responsibilities.
E. 1. Information received pursuant to this section by an
owner, administrator, or responsible entity of a child care
facility, shall be maintained in a confidential manner pursuant to
applicable state and federal laws.
2. The information, along with any other information relevant
to the ability of the individual to perform tasks that require
direct contact with children, may be released to another child care
facility in response to a request from the child care facility that
is considering employing or contracting with the individual unless
deemed confidential by state and federal laws.
3. Requirements for confidentiality and recordkeeping with
regard to the information shall be the same for the child care
facility receiving the information in response to a request as those

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided for in paragraph 1 of this subsection for the child care
facility releasing such information.
4. Information received by any facility certified by the Office
of Juvenile Affairs may be released to another facility certified by
the Office if an individual is being considered for employment or
contract, along with any other relevant information, unless the
information is deemed confidential by state or federal law. Any
information received by the Office shall be maintained in a
confidential manner pursuant to applicable state and federal law.
F. 1. It shall be unlawful for individuals who are required to
register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act to work with
or provide services to children or to reside in a child care
facility and for any employer who offers or provides services to
children to knowingly and willfully employ or contract with, or
allow continued employment of or contracting with individuals who
are required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration
Act. Individuals required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act who violate any provision of Section 401 et seq. of
this title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony
offense punishable by incarceration as provided for in subsections B
through F of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a
fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. It shall be unlawful for an individual who is the
perpetrator of a substantiated finding by the Department of heinous
and shocking abuse by a person responsible for a child’s health,
safety, or welfare, as those terms are defined in Section 1-1-105 of
Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, to work with or provide services
to children or to reside in a child care facility and for any
employer who offers or provides services to children to knowingly
and willfully employ or contract with, or allow continued employment
of or contracting with such individual.
3. Upon a determination by the Department of any violation of
the provisions of this section, the violator shall be subject to and
the Department may pursue:
a. an emergency order,
b. license revocation or denial,
c. injunctive proceedings,
d. an administrative penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00), and
e. referral for criminal proceedings.
4. In addition to the penalties specified by this section, the
violator may be liable for civil damages.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
April 20, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4300 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)